test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-e_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - saje: # ok NJUNE
    saje+N+Sg+Nom:  saˊj̣e
    saje+N+Sg+Gen:  saˊje
    saje+N+Sg+Acc:  saˊje
    saje+N+Sg+Ill:  saˊj̣an
    saje+N+Sg+Loc:  saajeest
    saje+N+Sg+Com:  soijijn # Matti Morottajain tärhistum
    saje+N+Sg+Abe:  saˊjettáá
    saje+N+Ess:  saijeen
    saje+N+Par:  saijeed
    saje+N+Pl+Nom:  saˊjeh
    saje+N+Pl+Gen:  [soojij, soˊjij]
    saje+N+Pl+Acc:  soojijd
    saje+N+Pl+Ill:  [soojijd, soijijd] # MM: j säänist máhđulávt
    saje+N+Pl+Loc:  soojijn
    saje+N+Pl+Com:  soˊjijguin
    saje+N+Pl+Abe:  soˊjijttáá

  Noun - mane: # ok NJUNE
    mane+N+Sg+Nom:  maˊṇe
    mane+N+Sg+Gen:  maˊne
    mane+N+Sg+Acc:  maˊne
    mane+N+Sg+Ill:  maṇan
    mane+N+Sg+Loc:  maaneest
    mane+N+Sg+Com:  moonijn # MM
    mane+N+Sg+Abe:  maˊnettáá
    mane+N+Ess:  manneen
    mane+N+Par:  manneed
    mane+N+Pl+Nom:  maˊneh
    mane+N+Pl+Gen:  [moonij, moˊnij]
    mane+N+Pl+Acc:  moonijd
    mane+N+Pl+Ill:  moonijd # MM
    mane+N+Pl+Loc:  moonijn
    mane+N+Pl+Com:  moˊnijguin
    mane+N+Pl+Abe:  moˊnijttáá

  Noun - kove: # ok NJUNE
    kove+N+Sg+Nom:  koˊṿe 
    kove+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊve
    kove+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊve
    kove+N+Sg+Ill:  koˊṿán
    kove+N+Sg+Loc:  kooveest
    kove+N+Sg+Com:  [kuvvijn, kuuvijn] # MM & MLO kuvvijn; ILWB IV kuuvijn
    kove+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊvettáá
    kove+N+Ess:   kovveen
    kove+N+Par:  kovveed
    kove+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊveh
    kove+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuuvij, kuˊvij]
    kove+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvijd
    kove+N+Pl+Ill:  [kuuvijd, kuvvijd] # MM, MLO & ILWB; MM iäpádâs - ill. kuhheeb om Vuoli Ilmarist
    kove+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvijn
    kove+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊvijguin
    kove+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊvijttáá

  Noun - njune: # ok NJUNE
    njune+N+Sg+Nom:  njuṇe
    njune+N+Sg+Gen:  njuˊne
    njune+N+Sg+Acc:  njuˊne
    njune+N+Sg+Ill:  njuˊṇán
    njune+N+Sg+Loc:  njuuneest
    njune+N+Sg+Com:   [njuunijn, njunnijn] #MM
    njune+N+Sg+Abe:  njuˊnettáá
    njune+N+Ess:  njunneen
    njune+N+Par:  njunneed
    njune+N+Pl+Nom:  njuˊneh
    njune+N+Pl+Gen:  [njuunij, njuˊnij]
    njune+N+Pl+Acc:  njuunijd
    njune+N+Pl+Ill:  njuunijd 
    njune+N+Pl+Loc:  njuunijn
    njune+N+Pl+Com:  njuˊnijguin
    njune+N+Pl+Abe:  njuˊnijttáá

  Noun - lope: # ok NJUNE
    lope+N+Sg+Nom:  loˊpe
    lope+N+Sg+Gen:  loˊve
    lope+N+Sg+Acc:  loˊve
    lope+N+Sg+Ill:  loˊpán
    lope+N+Sg+Loc:  looveest
    lope+N+Sg+Com:  luvvijn
    lope+N+Sg+Abe:  loˊvettáá
    lope+N+Ess:  loppeen
    lope+N+Par:  loppeed
    lope+N+Pl+Nom:  loˊveh
    lope+N+Pl+Gen:  [luuvij, luˊvij]
    lope+N+Pl+Acc:  luuvijd
    lope+N+Pl+Ill:  luvvijd
    lope+N+Pl+Loc:  luuvijn
    lope+N+Pl+Com:  luˊvijguin
    lope+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊvijttáá

  Noun - kope: # ok NJUNE
    kope+N+Sg+Nom:  koˊpe
    kope+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊve
    kope+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊve
    kope+N+Sg+Ill:  koˊpán
    kope+N+Sg+Loc:  kooveest
    kope+N+Sg+Com:  kuvvijn
    kope+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊvettáá
    kope+N+Ess:  koppeen
    kope+N+Par:  koppeed
    kope+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊveh
    kope+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuuvij, kuˊvij]
    kope+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvijd
    kope+N+Pl+Ill:  kuvvijd
    kope+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvijn
    kope+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊvijguin
    kope+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊvijttáá

  Noun - tupe: # ok NJUNE
    tupe+N+Sg+Nom:  tuˊpe
    tupe+N+Sg+Gen:  tuˊve
    tupe+N+Sg+Acc:  tuˊve
    tupe+N+Sg+Ill:  tuˊpán
    tupe+N+Sg+Loc:  tuuveest
    tupe+N+Sg+Com:  tuvvijn
    tupe+N+Sg+Abe:  tuˊvettáá
    tupe+N+Ess:  tuppeen
    tupe+N+Par:  tuppeed
    tupe+N+Pl+Nom:  tuˊveh
    tupe+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuuvij, tuˊvij]
    tupe+N+Pl+Acc:  tuuvijd
    tupe+N+Pl+Ill:  tuvvijd
    tupe+N+Pl+Loc:  tuuvijn
    tupe+N+Pl+Com:  tuˊvijguin
    tupe+N+Pl+Abe:  tuˊvijttáá

  Noun - supe: # ok NJUNE
    supe+N+Sg+Nom:  suˊpe
    supe+N+Sg+Gen:  suˊve
    supe+N+Sg+Acc:  suˊve
    supe+N+Sg+Ill:  suˊpán
    supe+N+Sg+Loc:  suuveest
    supe+N+Sg+Com:  suvvijn
    supe+N+Sg+Abe:  suˊvettáá
    supe+N+Ess:  suppeen
    supe+N+Par:  suppeed
    supe+N+Pl+Nom:  suˊveh
    supe+N+Pl+Gen:  [suuvij, suˊvij]
    supe+N+Pl+Acc:  suuvijd
    supe+N+Pl+Ill:  suvvijd
    supe+N+Pl+Loc:  suuvijn
    supe+N+Pl+Com:  suˊvijguin
    supe+N+Pl+Abe:  suˊvijttáá

  Noun - njihe: # ok NJUNE
    njihe+N+Sg+Nom:  njiˊhe
    njihe+N+Sg+Gen:  njiˊṿe
    njihe+N+Sg+Acc:  njiˊṿe
    njihe+N+Sg+Ill:  njiˊhán
    njihe+N+Sg+Loc:  njivveest
    njihe+N+Sg+Com:  njivvijn
    njihe+N+Sg+Abe:  njiˊṿettáá
    njihe+N+Ess:  njihheen
    njihe+N+Par:  njihheed
    njihe+N+Pl+Nom:  njiˊṿeh
    njihe+N+Pl+Gen:  [njiiṿij, njiˊṿij]
    njihe+N+Pl+Acc:  njiiṿijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Ill:  njivvijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Loc:  njiiṿijn
    njihe+N+Pl+Com:  njiˊṿijguin
    njihe+N+Pl+Abe:  njiˊṿijttáá
    
  Noun - mote: # ok NJUNE
    mote+N+Sg+Nom:  moˊte
    mote+N+Sg+Gen:  moˊđe
    mote+N+Sg+Acc:  moˊđe
    mote+N+Sg+Ill:  moˊtán
    mote+N+Sg+Loc:  moođeest
    mote+N+Sg+Com:  muuđijn
    mote+N+Sg+Abe:  moˊđettáá
    mote+N+Ess:  motteen
    mote+N+Par:  motteed
    mote+N+Pl+Nom:  moˊđeh
    mote+N+Pl+Gen:  [muuđij, muˊđij]
    mote+N+Pl+Acc:  muuđijd
    mote+N+Pl+Ill:  muuđijd
    mote+N+Pl+Loc:  muuđijn
    mote+N+Pl+Com:  muˊđijguin
    mote+N+Pl+Abe:  muˊđijttáá    

  Noun - alge: # ok ALGE
    alge+N+Sg+Nom:  alge
    alge+N+Sg+Gen:  aˊlge
    alge+N+Sg+Acc:  aˊlge
    alge+N+Sg+Ill:  aalgan
    alge+N+Sg+Loc:  algeest
    alge+N+Sg+Com:  olgijn
    alge+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊlgettáá
    alge+N+Ess:  algen
    alge+N+Par:  alged
    alge+N+Pl+Nom:  aˊlgeh
    alge+N+Pl+Gen:  [oolgij, oˊlgij]
    alge+N+Pl+Acc: oolgijd
    alge+N+Pl+Ill:  olgijd
    alge+N+Pl+Loc:  oolgijn
    alge+N+Pl+Com:  oˊlgijguin
    alge+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊlgijttáá

  Noun - alme: # ok ALGE
    alme+N+Sg+Nom:  alme
    alme+N+Sg+Gen:  aˊlme
    alme+N+Sg+Acc:  aˊlme
    alme+N+Sg+Ill:  aalman
    alme+N+Sg+Loc:  almeest
    alme+N+Sg+Com:  olmijn
    alme+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊlmettáá
    alme+N+Ess:  almen
    alme+N+Par:  almed
    alme+N+Pl+Nom:  aˊlmeh
    alme+N+Pl+Gen:  [oolmij, oˊlmij]
    alme+N+Pl+Acc:  oolmijd
    alme+N+Pl+Ill:  [oolmijd, olmijd]
    alme+N+Pl+Loc:  oolmijn
    alme+N+Pl+Com:  oˊlmijguin
    alme+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊlmijttáá

  Noun - aske: # ok ALGE
    aske+N+Sg+Nom:  aske
    aske+N+Sg+Gen:  aˊske
    aske+N+Sg+Acc:  aˊske
    aske+N+Sg+Ill:  aaskan
    aske+N+Sg+Loc:  askeest
    aske+N+Sg+Com:  oskijn
    aske+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊskettáá
    aske+N+Ess:   asken
    aske+N+Par:  asked
    aske+N+Pl+Nom:  aˊskeh
    aske+N+Pl+Gen:  [ooskij, oˊskij]
    aske+N+Pl+Acc:  ooskijd
    aske+N+Pl+Ill:  oskijd
    aske+N+Pl+Loc:  ooskijn
    aske+N+Pl+Com:  oˊskijguin
    aske+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊskijttáá

  Noun - pispe: #ok ALGE
    pispe+N+Sg+Nom:  pispe
    pispe+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊspe
    pispe+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊspe
    pispe+N+Sg+Ill:  piispán
    pispe+N+Sg+Loc:  pispeest
    pispe+N+Sg+Com:  pispijn
    pispe+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊspettáá
    pispe+N+Ess:  pispen
    pispe+N+Par: pisped
    pispe+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊspeh
    pispe+N+Pl+Gen:  [piispij, piˊspij]
    pispe+N+Pl+Acc:  piispijd
    pispe+N+Pl+Ill:  pispijd
    pispe+N+Pl+Loc:  piispijn
    pispe+N+Pl+Com:  piˊspijguin
    pispe+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊspijttáá

  Noun - olbe: # ok ALGE
    olbe+N+Sg+Nom:  olbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Gen:  oˊlbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Acc:  oˊlbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Ill:  oolbán
    olbe+N+Sg+Loc:  olbeest
    olbe+N+Sg+Com:  ulbijn
    olbe+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊlbettáá
    olbe+N+Ess:  olben
    olbe+N+Par:  olbed
    olbe+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊlbeh
    olbe+N+Pl+Gen:  [uulbij, uˊlbij]
    olbe+N+Pl+Acc:  uulbijd
    olbe+N+Pl+Ill:  ulbijd
    olbe+N+Pl+Loc:  uulbijn
    olbe+N+Pl+Com:  uˊlbijguin
    olbe+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊlbijttáá

  Noun - juhle: # ok ALGE
    juhle+N+Sg+Nom:  juhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Gen:  juˊhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Acc:  juˊhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Ill:  juuhlán
    juhle+N+Sg+Loc:  juhleest
    juhle+N+Sg+Com:  juhlijn
    juhle+N+Sg+Abe:  juˊhlettáá
    juhle+N+Ess:   juhlen
    juhle+N+Par:  juhled
    juhle+N+Pl+Nom:  juˊhleh
    juhle+N+Pl+Gen:  [juuhlij, juˊhlij]
    juhle+N+Pl+Acc:  juuhlijd
    juhle+N+Pl+Ill:  juhlijd
    juhle+N+Pl+Loc:  juuhlijn
    juhle+N+Pl+Com:  juˊhlijguin
    juhle+N+Pl+Abe:  juˊhlijttáá

  Noun - utke: # ok ALGE
    utke+N+Sg+Nom:  utke
    utke+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊđhe
    utke+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊđhe
    utke+N+Sg+Ill:  uutkán
    utke+N+Sg+Loc:  uđheest
    utke+N+Sg+Com:  uđhijn
    utke+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊđhettáá
    utke+N+Ess:  utken
    utke+N+Par:  utked
    utke+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊđheh
    utke+N+Pl+Gen:  [uuđhij, uˊđhij]
    utke+N+Pl+Acc:  uuđhijd
    utke+N+Pl+Ill:  uđhijd
    utke+N+Pl+Loc:  uuđhijn
    utke+N+Pl+Com:  uˊđhijguin
    utke+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊđhijttáá

  Noun - hadde: # ok HADDE
    hadde+N+Sg+Nom:  hadde
    hadde+N+Sg+Gen:  haˊde
    hadde+N+Sg+Acc:  haˊde
    hadde+N+Sg+Ill:  haadan
    hadde+N+Sg+Loc:  haddeest
    hadde+N+Sg+Com:  hoddijn
    hadde+N+Sg+Abe:  haˊdettáá
    hadde+N+Ess:  hadden
    hadde+N+Par:  hadded
    hadde+N+Pl+Nom:  haˊdeh
    hadde+N+Pl+Gen:  [hoodij, hoˊdij]
    hadde+N+Pl+Acc:  hoodijd
    hadde+N+Pl+Ill:  [hoodijd, hoddijd]
    hadde+N+Pl+Loc:  hoodijn
    hadde+N+Pl+Com:  hoˊdijguin
    hadde+N+Pl+Abe:  hoˊdijttáá

  Noun - sappe: # ok HADDE
    sappe+N+Sg+Nom:  sappe
    sappe+N+Sg+Gen:  saˊpe
    sappe+N+Sg+Acc:  saˊpe
    sappe+N+Sg+Ill:  saapan
    sappe+N+Sg+Loc:  sappeest
    sappe+N+Sg+Com:  soppijn
    sappe+N+Sg+Abe:  saˊpettáá
    sappe+N+Ess:  sappen
    sappe+N+Par:  sapped
    sappe+N+Pl+Nom:  saˊpeh
    sappe+N+Pl+Gen:  [soopij, soˊpij]
    sappe+N+Pl+Acc:  soopijd
    sappe+N+Pl+Ill:  soppijd
    sappe+N+Pl+Loc:  soopijn
    sappe+N+Pl+Com:  soˊpijguin
    sappe+N+Pl+Abe:  soˊpijttáá

  Noun - litte: # ok HADDE
    litte+N+Sg+Nom:  litte
    litte+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊte
    litte+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊte
    litte+N+Sg+Ill:  liitán
    litte+N+Sg+Loc:  litteest
    litte+N+Sg+Com:  littijn
    litte+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊtettáá
    litte+N+Ess:  litten
    litte+N+Par:  litted
    litte+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊteh
    litte+N+Pl+Gen:  [liitij, liˊtij]
    litte+N+Pl+Acc:  liitijd
    litte+N+Pl+Ill:  littijd # MM
    litte+N+Pl+Loc:  liitijn
    litte+N+Pl+Com:  liˊtijguin
    litte+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊtijttáá

  Noun - lodde: # ok HADDE
    lodde+N+Sg+Nom:  lodde
    lodde+N+Sg+Gen:  loˊde
    lodde+N+Sg+Acc:  loˊde
    lodde+N+Sg+Ill:  loodán
    lodde+N+Sg+Loc:  loddeest
    lodde+N+Sg+Com:  luddijn
    lodde+N+Sg+Abe:  loˊdettáá
    lodde+N+Ess:  lodden
    lodde+N+Par:  lodded
    lodde+N+Pl+Nom:  loˊdeh
    lodde+N+Pl+Gen:  [luudij, luˊdij]
    lodde+N+Pl+Acc:  luudijd
    lodde+N+Pl+Ill:  [luudijd, luddijd]
    lodde+N+Pl+Loc:  luudijn
    lodde+N+Pl+Com:  luˊdijguin
    lodde+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊdijttáá

  Noun - lanne: # ok HADDE
    lanne+N+Sg+Nom:  lanne
    lanne+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊṇe
    lanne+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊṇe
    lanne+N+Sg+Ill:  laaṇan
    lanne+N+Sg+Loc:  lanneest
    lanne+N+Sg+Com:  lonnijn
    lanne+N+Sg+Abe:  laṇettáá
    lanne+N+Ess:  lannen
    lanne+N+Par:  lanned
    lanne+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊṇeh
    lanne+N+Pl+Gen:  [looṇij, loˊṇij]
    lanne+N+Pl+Acc:  looṇijd
    lanne+N+Pl+Ill:  [looṇijd, lonnijd]
    lanne+N+Pl+Loc:  looṇijn
    lanne+N+Pl+Com:  loˊṇijguin
    lanne+N+Pl+Abe:  loˊṇijttáá

  Noun - ponne: # ok HADDE
    ponne+N+Sg+Nom:  ponne
    ponne+N+Sg+Gen:  poˊṇe
    ponne+N+Sg+Acc:  poˊṇe
    ponne+N+Sg+Ill:  pooṇán
    ponne+N+Sg+Loc:  ponneest
    ponne+N+Sg+Com:  punnijn
    ponne+N+Sg+Abe:  poˊṇettáá
    ponne+N+Ess:  ponnen
    ponne+N+Par:  ponnen
    ponne+N+Pl+Nom:  poˊṇeh
    ponne+N+Pl+Gen:  [puuṇij, puˊṇij]
    ponne+N+Pl+Acc:  puuṇijd
    ponne+N+Pl+Ill:  [puuṇijd, punnijd]
    ponne+N+Pl+Loc:  puuṇijn
    ponne+N+Pl+Com:  puˊṇijguin
    ponne+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊṇijttáá
